Louisiana, session 2026, HB488.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:645(B)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§645. Disposition of collections
* * *
B.
* * *
(2) The allocated amounts shall not exceed the limits set forth in Article VII,
Section 4 of the Constitution of Louisiana. When these limits have been reached,
there shall be no further allocation, and all additional collections for the year shall
be credited in full to the state treasury except as provided in R.S. 30:88.1 and R.S.
48:250.4.4.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-758 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 488
Section 2. R.S. 48:250.4.4 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§250.4.4. Belle Chasse Bridge Merit-Based Special Fund
A. There is hereby established in the state treasury, as a special fund, the
Belle Chasse Bridge Merit-Based Special Fund, hereinafter referred to as the "fund".
B. After allocation of money to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund as
provided in Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana and any other
revenues pursuant to the Constitution of Louisiana and the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, the treasurer shall deposit into the fund one-fifth of the portion of
recurring severance tax revenues collected in Plaquemines Parish that would
otherwise be deposited into the state general fund.
C. The monies in the fund shall be invested in the same manner as monies in
the state general fund. Interest earned on the investment of monies in the fund shall
be credited to the fund. Unexpended and unencumbered monies in the fund at the
end of the fiscal year shall remain in the fund.
D. Monies in the fund shall be appropriated to the Department of
Transportation and Development and shall be used exclusively as follows:
(1) To reduce toll rates on the Belle Chasse Bridge public-private partnership
project.
(2) To pay amounts owed to the developer for exercising the Department of
Transportation and Development's early handback option in the Belle Chasse Bridge
public-private partnership contract.
(3) To pay any annual consumer price index (CPI) buy-down payment
amount in the Belle Chasse Bridge public-private partnership contract.
(4) For Department of Transportation and Development projects or
improvements within any area identified pursuant to the Belle Chasse Bridge public-
private partnership contract for any alternative facility.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-758 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 488